Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 7
TREASURER

Cross references:

For county treasurer's fees, see § 30-1-102.

30-10-701. Election - term - bond - insurance.

A county treasurer shall be elected in each county for the term of four years and, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before entering upon the discharge of duties, shall execute to the people of the state of Colorado a surety bond to be approved by the board of county commissioners and filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder. Prior to the treasurer being sworn into office, the board of county commissioners shall set the amount of the surety bond by written resolution duly adopted by a majority vote of the board, which shall be entered in its minutes.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of the treasurer to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the treasurer while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 526.

G.S.

§ 630.

R.S. 08:

§ 1315.

C.L.

§ 8789.

CSA:

C. 45, § 136.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-1.

L. 56:

p. 129, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 499, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 562, § 23, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the oath of civil officers, see § 8 of art. XII, Colo. Const.; for the election and terms of county officers, see § 8 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.; for the election of the county treasurer, see § 1-4-206; for bonds executed by surety companies, see § 10-4-301; for the approval of bonds, see § 24-13-116; for bonds of county officers, see § 30-10-110.

30-10-702. Term of office.

The regular term of office of all county treasurers shall commence on the first day of January next after their election.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 117, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1316.

C.L.

§ 8790.

CSA:

C. 45, § 137.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-2.

30-10-703. Form of bond.

If a treasurer executes a bond pursuant to section 30-10-701 (1), the condition of the bond shall be in substance as follows: Whereas, .............., was elected to the office of County Treasurer of the County of ............ on the ............ day of ............; Now, therefore, the condition of this obligation is such, that if the said .............. and the treasurer's deputy and all persons employed in the treasurer's office shall faithfully and promptly perform the duties of said office, and if the said .............. and the treasurer's deputies shall pay or invest according to law, all moneys that shall come to the hands of the treasurer, and shall render a just and true account thereof whenever required by said board of county commissioners, or by any provision of law, and shall deliver over to a successor in office, or to any other person authorized by law to receive the same, all moneys, securities, books, papers, and other things appertaining thereto or belonging to the treasurer's office, the above obligation to be void, otherwise to be in full force and effect; except that the surety shall in no event be liable for any loss caused by the failure or insolvency of the depository in which the county treasurer or the treasurer's deputies deposit any such public funds, or for any loss arising out of the investment of any such funds.

Source:

G.L.

§ 527.

G.S.

§ 631.

R.S. 08:

§ 1317.

C.L.

§ 8791.

L. 33-34, Ex. Sess.:

p. 51, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 138.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-3.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 563, § 24, effective August 11.

30-10-704. Chief deputy treasurer - duties.

The county treasurer may appoint a chief deputy, who in the absence of the treasurer from his or her office, or in case of vacancy in said office, for any disability of the treasurer to perform the duties of his or her office, may perform all the duties of the office of treasurer, until such vacancy is filled or such disability removed. All acts of a chief deputy treasurer shall have the same effect as though performed by the county treasurer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 528.

G.S.

§ 632.

R.S. 08:

§ 1318.

C.L.

§ 8792.

CSA:

C. 45, § 139.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-4.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1077), ch. 80, p. 324, § 2, effective September 14.

30-10-705. Vacancy in office - how filled.

In case the office of county treasurer becomes vacant, the board of county commissioners shall appoint a suitable person to perform the duties of the treasurer. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the person so appointed shall give bond with like sureties and conditions as that required in county treasurers' bonds and in such sum as the board shall direct and shall be invested with all the duties of the treasurer, until such vacancy is filled or such disability removed.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of the appointee to the office of treasurer to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the treasurer while in office.

Source:

G.L.

§ 529.

G.S.

§ 633.

R.S. 08:

§ 1319.

C.L.

§ 8793.

CSA:

C. 45, § 140.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 563, § 25, effective August 11.

30-10-706. Officers who cannot be treasurer.

No person holding the office of sheriff, county judge, or county clerk and recorder, nor any member of the board of county commissioners, shall hold the office of county treasurer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 530.

G.S.

§ 634.

R.S. 08:

§ 1320.

C.L.

§ 8794.

CSA:

C. 45, § 141.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-6.

30-10-707. Treasurer to receive and pay moneys.

It is the duty of the county treasurer to receive all moneys belonging to the county, from whatsoever source they may be derived, and all other moneys which are by law directed to be paid to him. All money received by him for the use of the county shall be paid out by him only on the orders of the board of county commissioners, according to law, except where special provision for the payment thereof is otherwise made by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 531.

G.S.

§ 635.

R.S. 08:

§ 1321.

C.L.

§ 8795.

CSA:

C. 45, § 142.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-7.

30-10-708. Deposit of funds in banks and savings and loan associations.

In all counties of this state, the county treasurer shall deposit all the funds and moneys of whatever kind that come into the treasurer's possession by virtue of the office, in the treasurer's name as treasurer, in one or more state banks, national banks, or, in compliance with the provisions of article 47 of title 11, C.R.S., savings and loan associations that have previously been approved and designated by written resolution duly adopted by a majority vote of the board of county commissioners, which shall be entered in its minutes. The board, by written resolution similarly adopted, may authorize the county treasurer to invest all or any part of the funds and moneys in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. For the purposes of investment of funds of the county as set forth in said part 6, the board, by written resolution, may appoint one or more custodians of the funds, and such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

All securities so purchased shall be duly registered in the name of the county treasurer and shall be deposited and safely kept in the custody of some state bank or any national bank. No such security shall be sold or otherwise disposed of except pursuant to a resolution of said board of county commissioners similarly adopted, which resolution shall also approve and designate the bank or banks in which such proceeds shall then be deposited, or such resolution may in lieu thereof authorize the reinvestment of such proceeds in any of the securities specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Repealed.

No county treasurer, or member of the board of county commissioners, who acted in good faith in approving and designating such depository, is liable for loss of public funds deposited by such county treasurer or his deputies by reason of the default or insolvency of such depository; nor shall any county treasurer who invests any such funds or any member of the board of county commissioners who in good faith authorizes such investment be liable for any loss on account of such investment.

Subject to the requirements of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., funds of the county may be pooled for investment with the funds of other local government entities.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 366, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8796.

L. 33-34, Ex. Sess.:

p. 46, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 143.

L. 37:

p. 489, § 1.

L. 41:

p. 363, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-8.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 407, § 4, effective January 1, 1976; (2) amended and (3) and (4) repealed, pp. 391, 392, §§ 4, 6, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 76:

(1) amended, p. 310, § 53, effective May 20.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 576, § 8, effective June 10.

L. 83:

(6) added, p. 1010, § 2, effective March 29.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1113, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 500, § 2, effective May 16.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) was originally enacted as subsection (4) by House Bill 83-1097 but was renumbered on revision for ease of location.

30-10-709. Treasurer to keep accounts - settlement of accounts - resolution of findings - report to board of county commissioners - contempt.

The county treasurer shall keep a just and true account of the receipt and expenditure of all moneys that come into his or her hands by virtue of the office, in books to be kept by the treasurer for that purpose, which books shall be open at all times for the inspection of the board of county commissioners, or any member thereof, and to all county and state officers; and, at the meetings in July and January of the board of county commissioners, or at such other time as the board may direct, the treasurer shall settle with said board his or her account as treasurer, and, for that purpose, the treasurer shall exhibit to said board all his or her books, accounts, and all vouchers relating to the same, to be audited and allowed.

In addition to the audit described in subsection (1) of this section, the treasurer may periodically cause to be performed an audit of the operations and accounts of the county treasurer's office.

If a recommendation or finding is contained in the final report of any audit conducted pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section or section 29-1-603, C.R.S., the treasurer shall promptly address the recommendation or finding and shall report to the board of county commissioners regarding the disposition of the recommendation or finding no later than ninety days after the issuance of the final audit report. If a treasurer fails to address a recommendation or finding or fails to report to the board as required by this subsection (3), the board may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an order compelling the treasurer to comply with the provisions of this subsection (3). If the court issues an order compelling the treasurer to comply with the provisions of this subsection (3) and the treasurer fails to comply, the treasurer shall be subject to penalties for contempt of the court issuing the order. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to limit the ability of the board or any other person to pursue any other legal remedy available to the board or person with regard to the actions of the treasurer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 532.

G.S.

§ 636.

R.S. 08:

§ 1323.

C.L.

§ 8798.

CSA:

C. 45, § 145.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-9.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 239, § 2, effective April 10.

L. 2002:

(3) added, p. 73, § 1, effective August 7.

30-10-710. Apportionment and separation of funds.

It is the duty of the county treasurer to apportion and keep all taxes collected by him or her in the several funds for which the taxes were levied, and it shall not be lawful to use the moneys belonging to any fund for the purpose of paying warrants drawn upon some other fund or for the purpose of paying warrants issued before April 2, 1998, which properly should have been drawn upon some other fund; but the amount of interest gained through the investment of county funds, regardless of the origin of such funds, may be credited to the general fund of the county by the county treasurer, unless such investment is made from specific funds allocated for a definite purpose and so maintained. The treasurer and the sureties on his or her official bond or the insurer on the crime insurance policy, as applicable, shall be liable at the action of any taxpayer of the county for any violation of this section.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 112, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 1324.

C.L.

§ 8799.

CSA:

C. 45, § 146.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-10.

L. 55:

p. 249, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-10.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 149, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 563, § 26, effective August 11.

30-10-711. Payment of warrants - call published.

County orders and warrants, properly made and issued, shall be entitled to a preference as to payment, according to the order of time in which they may be presented to the county treasurer; but where two or more orders are presented at the same time, precedence shall be given to the order or warrant of the oldest date, and when two or more orders are presented at the same time, and there are no funds to the credit of the proper fund in the treasury to pay the same, the same shall be registered in the order of their date, precedence being given to the warrant of the oldest date. When there is in the treasury, to the credit of any fund, five hundred dollars or more, against which fund there are any outstanding and unpaid lawful warrants or orders, the county treasurer shall immediately give public notice of the fact by a written notice posted for thirty days at the outer door of the office of the treasurer. The treasurer, at the same time, shall call in for payment all outstanding and unpaid lawful warrants and orders drawn on said fund which the moneys in the treasury will pay and which are entitled to payment from said funds.

Such notice shall also contain the number, date, and amount of such warrants and orders as are entitled to payment and call upon the holders thereof to present the same for payment to the treasurer within thirty days from the day of the posting of said notice, and that interest on the sums due by said warrants and orders will cease to accrue thereon after the last day of said posting of said notice, and interest shall cease to accrue on said sums accordingly. Such notice shall be dated at the county seat, be signed by the treasurer, and a record of the same be kept in the office of the treasurer in a book provided for that purpose; and such books shall be open to inspection and examination at all reasonable hours. Such funds shall be held by the county treasurer for the payment of the warrants and orders called by him, until the expiration of six years from the date of registry of such warrants and orders, when the same shall be paid out upon such other warrants or orders as are entitled to payment on the day of the expiration of the six years.

The treasurer shall pay by electronic transfer any written authorization issued by the board of county commissioners directing the treasurer to make payment of claims against the county electronically.

Payment of county warrants and orders by electronic transfer shall be made only after the treasurer approves the release of funds for such electronic transfer.

For purposes of this part 7, "order" means all orders and authorizations issued by the board of county commissioners for the payment of claims against the county. "Order" includes any warrant issued by the board of county commissioners and any written authorization issued by the board of county commissioners directing the treasurer to make payment of claims against the county by electronic transfer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 533.

G.S.

§ 637.

L. 1887:

p. 243, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 1325.

C.L.

§ 8800.

CSA:

C. 45, § 147.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-11.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 563, § 25, effective April 24.

L. 98:

(3) to (5) added, p. 149, § 2, effective April 2.

Cross references:

For the publication of legal notices, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24.

30-10-712. Funds payable in order of presentment.

Every fund in the hands of the county treasurer for disbursements shall be paid out in the order in which the orders drawn thereon and payable out of said fund are presented for payment.

Source:

G.L.

§ 540.

G.S.

§ 644.

R.S. 08:

§ 1327.

C.L.

§ 8802.

CSA:

C. 45, § 149.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-13.

30-10-713. Delivery of books to successor - penalty.

Upon the resignation or removal from office of any county treasurer, all the books and papers belonging to the treasurer's office, and all moneys in the treasurer's hands by virtue of the treasurer's office, shall be delivered to the treasurer's successor in office, upon the oath of such preceding treasurer, or in case of the treasurer's death, upon oath of the treasurer's executors or administrators. If any such preceding county treasurer, or in case of the treasurer's death, the treasurer's executors or administrators neglect or refuse to deliver up such books, papers, and moneys on oath, when lawfully demanded, every such person shall forfeit a sum of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars.

Source:

G.L.

§ 534.

G.S.

§ 638.

R.S. 08:

§ 1328.

C.L.

§ 8803.

CSA:

C. 45, § 150.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-14.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 564, § 27, effective August 11.

30-10-714. Treasurer collector of taxes.

The county treasurer of each county shall be, by virtue of his office, collector of taxes therein, and shall perform such duties in that regard as are prescribed by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 535.

G.S.

§ 639.

R.S. 08:

§ 1329.

C.L.

§ 8804.

CSA:

C. 45, § 151.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-15.

30-10-715. Treasurer to issue receipt for money collected.

Upon payment of any money to him or her and upon request of an individual taxpayer or the taxpayer's agent, the county treasurer shall issue and shall mail, if additionally requested, his or her receipt to the person paying it, setting forth the account upon which it is paid, and, in the case of the payment of taxes, such receipt shall state the valuation of property taxed, the rate of taxation, and the total amount of such taxes.

Source:

G.L.

§ 538.

G.S.

§ 642.

L. 1887:

p. 234, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1330.

C.L.

§ 8805.

CSA:

C. 45, § 152.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-16.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1077), ch. 80, p. 324, § 3, effective September 14.

30-10-716. Treasurer to assess property, when.

It is the duty of the county treasurer to assess, at a fair value, the property of any person liable to pay taxes which the county assessor has failed to assess, to place the same on the tax roll, and to collect taxes on the same in the manner provided by law. Such treasurer shall not be compelled to assess such property in person; and he is authorized to administer oaths to such persons, or any others, touching the value of said property.

Source:

G.L.

§ 536.

G.S.

§ 640.

R.S. 08:

§ 1331.

C.L.

§ 8806.

CSA:

C. 45, § 153.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-17.

30-10-717. Cash book - open to inspection. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 537.

G.S.

§ 641.

R.S. 08:

§ 1332.

C.L.

§ 8807.

CSA:

C. 45, § 154.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-18.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (HB 20-1077), ch. 80, p. 324, § 4, effective September 14.

30-10-718. Registry of orders - open to inspection.

Every county treasurer shall keep in his or her office a record to be called the registry of county orders wherein shall be entered at the date of the presentation thereof and without any interval or blank line between any such entry and the one preceding it every county order or other certificate or evidence of county indebtedness presented to such county treasurer for payment. At any time that the county has insufficient funds to pay the indebtedness evidenced on such order or other certificate or evidence of county indebtedness, the date and number of such order, the amount for which the same is payable, the date of the presentation thereof, the name of the person to whom such order is by the terms thereof payable, and the name of the person presenting the same. Every such registry of county orders, at all reasonable hours, shall be open to inspection and examination of any person desiring to inspect or examine the same.

Source:

G.L.

§ 539.

G.S.

§ 643.

R.S. 08:

§ 1333.

C.L.

§ 8808.

CSA:

C. 45, § 155.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-19.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 150, § 3, effective April 2.

30-10-719. Charge to grand jury. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 457, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1334.

C.L.

§ 8809.

L. 33:

p. 402, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 156.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-20.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-720. Committee to investigate accounts of treasurer. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 457, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1335.

C.L.

§ 8810.

CSA:

C. 45, § 157.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-21.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-721. Investigation of accounts - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 458, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 1336.

C.L.

§ 8811.

CSA:

C. 45, § 158.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-22.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-722. Committee appointed once in three months only. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 458, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 1337.

C.L.

§ 8812.

CSA:

C. 45, § 159.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-23.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-723. Committee power to examine witnesses. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 458, § 5.

R.S. 08:

§ 1338.

C.L.

§ 8813.

CSA:

C. 45, § 160.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-24.

L. 72:

p. 557, § 12.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-724. Committee to examine books and accounts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 459, § 6.

R.S. 08:

§ 1339.

C.L.

§ 8814.

CSA:

C. 45, § 161.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-25.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-725. Refusal of treasurer to answer - contempt. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1889:

p. 459, § 7.

R.S. 08:

§ 1340.

C.L.

§ 8815.

CSA:

C. 45, § 162.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-26.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1052, § 8, effective July 1.

30-10-726. Failure of treasurer to perform duties - penalty.

Every county treasurer who fails, neglects, or refuses to perform the duties of the office of the treasurer set forth in this part 7 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, and the court may adjudge that such treasurer be removed from office. This section shall extend to the deputies of every such county treasurer.

Source:

G.L.

§ 542.

G.S.

§ 646.

R.S. 08:

§ 1341.

C.L.

§ 8816.

CSA:

C. 45, § 163.

CRS 53:

§ 35-7-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-7-27.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 150, § 4, effective April 2.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 74, § 2, effective August 7.